test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-ngumhTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ӈумʼ: # Noun 'hay /(fin) ӈумʼ' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi m+o/
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom: ӈумʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc: ӈувмʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen: ӈувʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat: ӈумдʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [ӈумгана, ӈумгна]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl: ӈумгад
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros: ӈумна
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom: ӈумгʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc: ӈумгʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen: ӈумгʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom: ӈувˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc: ӈуво
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen: ӈувоˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat: ӈумгˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [ӈумгаˮна, ӈумгˮна]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl: ӈумгат
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros: ӈувоˮмана
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈум, ӈуми]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈум, ӈуми]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈумн, ӈумни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈумган, ӈумгани, ӈумгни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈумганан, ӈумгнан, ӈумганани, ӈумгнани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈумгадан, ӈумгдан, ӈумгадани, ӈумгдани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈумнан, ӈумнани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈумгаюн, ӈумгюн, ӈумгаюни, ӈумгюни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈумгаюн, ӈумгюн, ӈумгаюни, ӈумгюни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈумгаюн, ӈумгюн, ӈумгаюни, ӈумгюни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈувон, ӈувони]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈувон, ӈувони]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈувоˮн, ӈувоˮни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈумгаˮн, ӈумгаˮни, ӈумгˮни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈумгаˮнан, ӈумгˮнан, ӈумгаˮнани, ӈумгˮнани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈумгатан, ӈумгтан, ӈумгатани, ӈумгтани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈувоˮманан, ӈувоˮманани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈумл
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈумд
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈумд
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈумганд
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [ӈумгананд, ӈумгнанд]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [ӈумгаданд, ӈумгданд]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈумнанд
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [ӈумгаюд, ӈумгюд]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [ӈумгаюд, ӈумгюд]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [ӈумгают, ӈумгют]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈувод
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈувод
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈувот
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈумгат
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [ӈумгаˮнат, ӈумгˮнат]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [ӈумгатат, ӈумгтат]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈувоˮманат
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈумда
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈумда
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈумда
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈумганда
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [ӈумгананда, ӈумгнанда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [ӈумгаданда, ӈумгданда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈумнанда
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [ӈумгаюда, ӈумгюда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [ӈумгаюда, ӈумгюда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [ӈумгаюта, ӈумгюта]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈувода
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈувода
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈувота
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: [ӈумгата, ӈумгта]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [ӈумгаˮната, ӈумгˮната]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ӈумгатата, ӈумгтата]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈувоˮманата
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈумиʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈуми
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈумиʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈуми
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈумниʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈумни
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: [ӈумганиʼ, ӈумгниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгани, ӈумгни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [ӈумгананиʼ, ӈумгнаниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: [ӈумганани, ӈумгнани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈумгаданиʼ, ӈумгданиʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгадани, ӈумгдани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈумнаниʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈумнани
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [ӈумгаюниʼ, ӈумгюниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгаюни, ӈумгюни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [ӈумгаюниʼ, ӈумгюниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгаюни, ӈумгюни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [ӈумгаюниʼ, ӈумгюниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгаюни, ӈумгюни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈувониʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: ӈувони
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈувониʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: ӈувони
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈувоˮниʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: ӈувоˮни
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: [ӈумгаˮниʼ, ӈумгˮниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгаˮни, ӈумгˮни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [ӈумгаˮнаниʼ, ӈумгˮнаниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгаˮнани, ӈумгˮнани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈумгатаниʼ, ӈумгтаниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [ӈумгатани, ӈумгтани]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈувоˮмананиʼ
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: ӈувоˮманани
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈумлиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈумгандиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [ӈумганандиʼ, ӈумгнандиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [ӈумгадандиʼ, ӈумгдандиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈумнандиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [ӈумгаюдиʼ, ӈумгюдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [ӈумгаюдиʼ, ӈумгюдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [ӈумгаютиʼ, ӈумгютиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈуводиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈуводиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈувотиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: [ӈумгатиʼ, ӈумгтиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [ӈумгаˮнатиʼ, ӈумгˮнатиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ӈумгататиʼ, ӈумгтатиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈувоˮманатиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈумгандиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [ӈумганандиʼ, ӈумгнандиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈумгадандиʼ, ӈумгдандиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈумнандиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [ӈумгаюдиʼ, ӈумгюдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [ӈумгаюдиʼ, ӈумгюдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [ӈумгаютиʼ, ӈумгютиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈуводиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈуводиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈувотиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: [ӈумгатиʼ, ӈумгтиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [ӈумгаˮнатиʼ, ӈумгˮнатиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈумгататиʼ, ӈумгтатиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈувоˮманатиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈумаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈумаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈумнаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: [ӈумганаˮ, ӈумгнаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [ӈумгананаˮ, ӈумгнанаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈумгаданаˮ, ӈумгданаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈумнанаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [ӈумгаюнаˮ, ӈумгюнаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [ӈумгаюнаˮ, ӈумгюнаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [ӈумгаюнаˮ, ӈумгюнаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈувонаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈувонаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈувоˮнаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: [ӈумгаˮнаˮ, ӈумгˮнаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [ӈумгаˮнанаˮ, ӈумгˮнанаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈумгатанаˮ, ӈумгтанаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈувоˮмананаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈумлаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈумдаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈумдаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈумгандаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [ӈумганандаˮ, ӈумгнандаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈумгадандаˮ, ӈумгдандаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈумнандаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [ӈумгаюдаˮ, ӈумгюдаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [ӈумгаюдаˮ, ӈумгюдаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [ӈумгаютаˮ, ӈумгютаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈуводаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈуводаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈувотаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: [ӈумгатаˮ, ӈумгтаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [ӈумгаˮнатаˮ, ӈумгˮнатаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈумгататаˮ, ӈумгтатаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈувоˮманатаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈумдоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈумдоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈумдоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈумгандоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [ӈумганандоʼ, ӈумгнандоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈумгадандоʼ, ӈумгдандоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈумнандоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [ӈумгаюдоʼ, ӈумгюдоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [ӈумгаюдоʼ, ӈумгюдоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [ӈумгаютоʼ, ӈумгютоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈуводоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈуводоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈувотоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: [ӈумгатоʼ, ӈумгтоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [ӈумгаˮнатоʼ, ӈумгˮнатоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈумгататоʼ, ӈумгтатоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈувоˮманатоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Abs: ӈумд
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈумдав, ӈумдув, ӈумдами, ӈумдми]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈумдав, ӈумдув, ӈумдами, ӈумдми]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈумдан, ӈумдани, ӈумдни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈумдар
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈумдамд
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈумданд
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [ӈумдада, ӈумдда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [ӈумдамда, ӈумдмда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [ӈумданда, ӈумднда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [ӈумдамиʼ, ӈумдмиʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: [ӈумдами, ӈумдми]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [ӈумдамиʼ, ӈумдмиʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1.2: [ӈумдами, ӈумдми]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [ӈумданиʼ, ӈумдниʼ]
#     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1.2: [ӈумдани, ӈумдни]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ӈумдриʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [ӈумдамдиʼ, ӈумдмдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [ӈумдандиʼ, ӈумдндиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [ӈумдадиʼ, ӈумддиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [ӈумдамдиʼ, ӈумдмдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [ӈумдандиʼ, ӈумдндиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ӈумдваˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ӈумдваˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [ӈумданаˮ, ӈумднаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ӈумдраˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [ӈумдамдаˮ, ӈумдмдаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [ӈумдандаˮ, ӈумдндаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [ӈумдадоʼ, ӈумддоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [ӈумдамдоʼ, ӈумдмдоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [ӈумдандоʼ, ӈумдндоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈумдмʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈумд
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈумниʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈумгʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈумаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈумдаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈувˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈумдамзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈумдась
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈумнинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈумдинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈумганзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈумаць
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈумдаць
     ӈумʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈуваць
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈум
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумл
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумда
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумлиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумдиʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумлаˮ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈумдоʼ
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумась
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумлась
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумдась
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈуминзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумлинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумдинзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумаць
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумлаць
     ӈумʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈумдонзь
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюн, ӈумгюн]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюд, ӈумгюд]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюда, ӈумгюда]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюниʼ, ӈумгюниʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдиʼ, ӈумгюдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдиʼ, ӈумгюдиʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюнаˮ, ӈумгюнаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдаˮ, ӈумгюдаˮ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдоʼ, ӈумгюдоʼ]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюнась, ӈумгюнась]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдась, ӈумгюдась]
     ӈумʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: [ӈумгаюдась, ӈумгюдась]
